test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-suenduemae69_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `sündümä: # Verb (69) `sündümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sündümä+V+Inf/mA: sündümä
     sündümä+V+Inf: sündüdäq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sünnü
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [sünnüt, sünnüdeq]
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sünnüs
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sünnümiq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sünnütiq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sünnüseq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [sünnü-üiq, sünnü-üi, sünnü-iq, sünnü-i]
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: sünnüq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: sünnü
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sünnütäs
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [sünnütä-äiq, sünnütä-äi, sünnütä-iq, sünnütä-i]
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: sünnütäq
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: sünnütä

     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sündü
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [sündüt, sündüq, sündüdeq]
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sündü
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sündümiq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sündütiq
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [sündüq, sündüväq]
     sündümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [sünnü-üs, sünnü-s]
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sünnüti
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:
#     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:
     sündümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [sünnütä-äs, sünnütä-s]

     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: sündüv
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: sündüvä
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: sündüvät
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: sündüvähe
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: sündüväq
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [sündüvide, sündüviide]
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [sündüvit, sündüviid]
     sündümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [sündüvihe, sündüviihe]

     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: sünnütäv
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: sünnütävä
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: sünnütävät
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: sünnütävähe
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: sünnütäväq
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [sünnütävide, sünnütäviide]
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [sünnütävit, sünnütäviid]
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [sünnütävihe, sünnütäviihe]

     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: sündünüq
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: sündünü
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: sündünüt
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: sündünühe
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: sündünüq
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [sündünüide, sündünüisi]
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [sündünüid, sündünüisi]
     sündümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [sündünüihe, sündünüisihe]

     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [sünnüt, sünnütü]
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: sünnüdü
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: sünnütüt
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: sünnütühe
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: sünnüdüq
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [sünnütüide, sünnütüisi]
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [sünnütüid, sünnütüisi]
     sündümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [sünnütüihe, sünnütüisihe]
